Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Massachusetts Trust Act of 1961

48-101-201. Short title.

This part may be known and cited as the “Massachusetts Trust Act of 1961.”

Acts 1961, ch. 247, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 48-1801, 48-3-201.

Law Reviews.

The Massachusetts Trust, 31 Tenn. L. Rev. 471.

Attorney General Opinions. Application of Tenn. Const, art. II, § 9, to a local government investing in a mutual fund organized as a business trust that invests in assets authorized under Tennessee law, OAG 07-125, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 125 (8/17/07).

48-101-202. Definition — Levy of tax authorized.

A Massachusetts trust is an unincorporated business association created at common law by an instrument under which property is held and managed by trustees for the benefit and profit of such persons as may be or may become the holders of transferable certificates evidencing beneficial interests in the trust estate, the holders of which certificates are entitled to the same limitation of personal liability extended to stockholders of private corporations.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed or held to authorize the levy of any tax on earnings or distributions from an investment fund organized as a unit investment trust taxable as a grantor trust under 26 U.S.C. §§ 671-677 (whether or not such trust would otherwise constitute a business trust); provided, that not less than seventy-five percent (75%) of the value of the investments of such investment fund shall be in any combination of bonds of the United States, state of Tennessee, or any county or any municipality or political subdivision of the state, including any agency, board, authority, or commission of the state or its subdivisions.

Acts 1961, ch. 247, § 2; T.C.A., § 48-1802; Acts 1989, ch. 524, § 5; T.C.A., § 48-3-202.

48-101-203. Recognized form of association.

A Massachusetts trust is permitted as a recognized form of association for the conduct of business within the state of Tennessee.

Acts 1961, ch. 247, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 48-1803, 48-3-203.

48-101-204. Filing of trust instrument.

Any Massachusetts trust desiring to do business in this state shall file with the secretary of state a verified copy of the trust instrument creating such trust and any amendment thereto, the assumed business name, if any, and the names and addresses of its trustees; it shall also file true copies of the foregoing with the county register in the county in which it has its principal place of business in this state, and also in any county in which it owns any real property.

Acts 1961, ch. 247, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 48-1804, 48-3-204.

48-101-205. Binding effect of trust instrument.

Any person dealing with such Massachusetts trust shall be bound by the terms and conditions of the trust instrument and any amendments thereto so filed.

Acts 1961, ch. 247, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 48-1804, 48-3-205.

48-101-206. Taxation and fees.

Any Massachusetts trust created under this part or entering this state pursuant thereto shall pay such taxes and fees as are imposed by the laws, ordinances, and resolutions of the state of Tennessee, and any counties and municipalities thereof, on domestic and foreign corporations, respectively, on an identical basis therewith. In computing such taxes and fees, the shares of beneficial interest of such a trust shall have the character for tax purposes of shares of stock in private corporations.

Acts 1961, ch. 247, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 48-1804, 48-3-206.

48-101-207. Corporation laws applicable.

Any Massachusetts trust shall be subject to such applicable provisions of law, now or hereafter enacted, with respect to domestic and foreign corporations, respectively, as relate to the issuance of securities, filing of required statements or reports, service of process, general grants of power to act, right to sue and be sued, limitation of individual liability of shareholders, rights to acquire, mortgage, sell, lease, operate and otherwise to deal in real and personal property, and other applicable rights and duties existing under the common law and statutes of this state in a manner similar to those applicable to domestic and foreign corporations.

Acts 1961, ch. 247, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 48-1804, 48-3-207.

Cross-References. Business corporations, title 48, chs. 11-27.